Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2201
Act, how cited.

Sections 76-2201 to 76-2250 shall be known and may be cited as the Real Property Appraiser Act.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 6;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 618, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 13;

Laws 2014, LB717, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB729, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB707, § 47;

Laws 2024, LB992, § 1.